Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 26 Redemption, Release, and Transfer of Mortgages

34-26-1.
Complaint to redeem.

Any person entitled in equity to redeem any mortgaged property, whether real or personal, may prefer a complaint to redeem the property, which complaint may be heard, tried and determined according to the usages in chancery and the principles of equity.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 207, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 258, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 302, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 442, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

34-26-1

.

34-26-2.
Right to discharge on satisfaction of mortgage — Escrow accounts.

Every mortgagee of real estate, his, her or its heirs, executors, administrators, successors, or assigns, having received full satisfaction for the money due on the mortgage, shall, within thirty (30) days after final payment, discharge the mortgage as provided in §

34-26-3

or by separate instrument of release of the mortgage, and shall send the discharge to be recorded in the proper record book with suitable references to the original record, including the mortgagor’s name and address, which shall forever afterwards discharge, defeat and release the mortgage and perpetually bar all actions to be brought thereon in any court. Upon forwarding the discharge for recording the mortgagee shall notify the mortgagor. Any mortgagor or his agent upon tendering final payment to the mortgagee in full satisfaction of the mortgage may in writing require the mortgagee to issue the discharge by separate instrument of release, directly to a designated person or real estate closing officer within the thirty (30) day period.

Every mortgagee of real estate, his, her or its heirs, executors, administrators or successors or assigns, having received full satisfaction for the money due on the mortgage, shall, within thirty (30) days after final payment, disburse to the mortgagor any and all funds held in escrow under the terms of the mortgage.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 207, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 258, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 302, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 442, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

34-26-2

; P.L. 1960, ch. 147, § 3; P.L. 1980, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 53, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 482, § 1.

34-26-3.
Methods of discharge.

A mortgage may be discharged in whole or in part by an entry acknowledging the satisfaction thereof or the payment thereon, as the case may be, made on the face or back of the mortgage, or upon the face or margin of the record of the mortgage, in the records of land evidence, and signed by the mortgagee or by his or her executor, administrator, successor, or, if the mortgage be assigned, by the assignee or his or her executor or administrator; and such entry shall have the same effect as a deed of release duly acknowledged and recorded.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 207, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 258, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 302, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 442, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

34-26-3

.

34-26-4.
Requiring assignment of mortgage in lieu of discharge — Enforcement by incumbrancers.

Where a mortgagor is entitled to redeem, he or she shall by virtue of this section have power to require the mortgagee, instead of discharging or reconveying, and on the terms on which he or she would be bound to discharge or reconvey, to assign the mortgage debt and convey the mortgaged property to such third person as the mortgagor directs; provided, that the mortgagor assumes the expense of making the assignment and conveyance, and obligates himself or herself to have the same recorded, and the fact of the transfer being made shall be prima facie evidence that the assumption of expense and the obligation have been made; and the mortgagee shall, by virtue of this section, be bound, on being relieved of all expense and having the obligation made to him or her, to assign and convey accordingly; and the right shall belong to and be capable of being enforced by each incumbrancer, or by the mortgagor, notwithstanding any intermediate incumbrance, but a requisition of an incumbrancer shall prevail over a requisition of the mortgagor and, as between incumbrancers, a requisition of a prior incumbrancer shall prevail over a requisition of a subsequent incumbrancer. This section does not apply in the case of a mortgagee being or having been in possession.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 207, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 258, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 302, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 442, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

34-26-4

.

34-26-5.
Liability of mortgagee for failure to discharge, release, or transfer mortgage.

If any mortgagee, his, her or its heirs, executors, administrators, agents, successors, or assigns, shall not, within ten (10) days after a request made in that behalf and a tender of all reasonable charges therefor, discharge the mortgage in one of the modes aforesaid, or otherwise make and execute a release and quitclaim of the estate so mortgaged, and acknowledge it before some proper officer, or transfer the mortgage if required under the provisions of §

34-26-4

, he, she, or they so refusing shall be liable to make good all damages that shall accrue for want of the discharge, release, or transfer, to be recovered in a civil action; and in case judgment shall pass against the party sued, the mortgagee shall pay the plaintiff reasonable attorney’s fees and triple costs upon the suit.

In the event of noncompliance with the provisions of either this section and/or §

34-26-2

, the mortgagee shall pay a penalty to the mortgagor for noncompliance in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00) for a first day of noncompliance and five dollars ($5.00) for each day thereafter that the party remains in noncompliance. The mortgagor shall also be entitled to a reimbursement of reasonable attorney’s fees, if applicable, for the costs incurred by the mortgagor and/or his, her or its attorneys in attempting to obtain a discharge to which the mortgage was lawfully entitled pursuant to the provisions of this section and/or §

34-26-2

. Demand for penalties and, if applicable, attorney’s fees and costs pursuant to this section may be made to the department of business regulation, in those instances in which the mortgagee is a regulated institution as defined in Title 19, and the department shall direct such regulated institutions to pay applicable penalties and reimburse effected mortgagors for attorneys fees and costs incurred, on confirmed instances of noncompliance. The department may promulgate rules and regulations governing the processing of such reimbursement. In those instances in which the mortgagee is not a regulated institution as defined in Title 19, the Department shall provide the mortgagor with the name, address and telephone number of the regulatory agency having jurisdiction over the actions of such mortgagees.

As used herein, the term “first day of noncompliance” shall mean the first day following the last day for a mortgagee or similar party to discharge the mortgage.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 207, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 258, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 302, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 442, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

34-26-5

; P.L. 1986, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 476, § 1.

34-26-6.
Other forms of discharge or release preserved.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be so construed as to defeat, invalidate, annul, or render ineffectual any other legal or equitable discharge, payment, satisfaction, or release of any mortgage.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 207, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 258, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 302, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 442, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

34-26-6

.

34-26-7.
Certain ancient mortgages becoming void unless continued.

On and after January 1, 1989, no power of sale in any mortgage of real estate, except mortgages made by public utilities and non-amortizing mortgages made by Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation now or hereafter of record, shall be exercised and no entry shall be made, nor possession taken, nor proceeding begun for foreclosure of any such mortgage after the expiration of a period which shall be thirty-five (35) years from the date of recording of the mortgage, or in the case of a mortgage in which the term or maturity date is stated, five (5) years from the expiration of the term or maturity date, unless an extension of the mortgage, or an acknowledgment by affidavit of the mortgagee that the mortgage is not satisfied, is recorded before the expiration of the applicable time period. In case an extension of the mortgage or such an acknowledgment by affidavit is so recorded, the period shall continue until five (5) years shall have elapsed during which there is not recorded any further extension of the mortgage nor acknowledgment nor affidavit that the mortgage is not satisfied. The period shall not be extended by nonresidence nor disability of any person interested in the mortgage or the real estate, or by any partial payment, agreement, extension, acknowledgment, affidavit, or other action not meeting the requirements of this section. All extensions, agreements, affidavits and acknowledgments shall be indexed in the land evidence records under the name of the present landowner. Upon the expiration of the applicable period provided herein, the mortgage shall be treated for title purposes as if it had been properly discharged by the record holder thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 293, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 96, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 106, § 1.

34-26-8.
Release of mortgage — Affidavit.

For purposes of this section:

“Mortgage” means a mortgage upon any interest in real property located in the State of Rhode Island.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or other legal or commercial entity;

“Mortgagor” means the grantor of a mortgage;

“Mortgagee” means the grantee of a mortgage; provided, if the mortgage has been assigned of record. “Mortgagee” means the last person to whom the mortgage has been assigned of record; provided further, if the mortgage has been serviced by a mortgage servicer, “Mortgagee” means the mortgage servicer;

“Mortgage servicer” means the last person to whom the mortgagor has been instructed by the mortgagee to send payment of the mortgage. The person who has transmitted a payoff statement shall be deemed to be the mortgage servicer with respect to the mortgage described in that payoff statement;

“Attorney-at-law” means any person admitted to practice law in this state and in good standing;

“Title insurance company” means any corporation or other business entity authorized and licensed to transact the business of insuring titles to interests in real property in this state; and

“Payoff statement” means a written statement of the amount of the unpaid balance on a mortgage, including principal, interest and other charges properly assessed pursuant to the loan documentation of such mortgage and of the interest on a per diem basis with respect to the unpaid principal balance of the mortgage.

If a mortgagee fails to execute and deliver a release of mortgage to the mortgagor or to the mortgagor’s designated agent within thirty (30) days from receipt of payment of the mortgage by the mortgagee in accordance with the payoff statement furnished by the mortgagee, any attorney-at-law or duly authorized officer of a title insurance company may, on behalf of the mortgagor or any transferee of the mortgagor who has acquired title to the premises described in the mortgage, execute and cause to be recorded in the land records of each city or town where the mortgage was recorded, an affidavit which complies with the requirements of this section.

An affidavit pursuant to this section shall state that:

The affiant is an attorney-at-law or the authorized officer of a title insurance company, and that the affidavit is made in behalf of and at the request of the mortgagor;

The mortgagee has provided a payoff statement with respect to the loan secured by the mortgage;

The affiant has ascertained that the mortgagee has received payment of the loan secured by the mortgage in accordance with the payoff statement, as evidence by a bank check, certified check or attorney’s clients’ funds account which has been negotiated by the mortgagee or by other documentary evidence of such receipt of payment by the mortgagee;

More than sixty (60) days have elapsed since payment was received by the mortgagee; and

The affiant has given the mortgagee at least thirty (30) days’ notice in writing by certified mail, return receipt request and signed for and completed, of intention to execute and cause to be recorded an affidavit in accordance with this section with a copy of the proposed affidavit attached to such written notice, and that the mortgagee has not responded in writing to such notification, or that any request for additional payment made by the mortgagee has been complied with at least fifteen (15) days prior to the date of the affidavit.

Such affidavit shall state the names of the mortgagor and the mortgagee, the date of the mortgage, and the volume and page of the land records where the mortgage is recorded. The affidavit shall give similar information with respect to any recorded assignment of the mortgage.

The affiant shall attach to the affidavit:

Photostatic copies of the documentary evidence that payment has been received by the mortgagee, including mortgagee’s endorsement of any bank check, certified check or attorney’s clients’ funds account,

A photostatic copy of the written payoff statement and shall certify on each that it is a true copy of the original document, and

Evidence of mailing and receipt notice to mortgagee.

Such affidavit, when recorded, shall be a release of the lien of such mortgage of the property described therein.

The city or town clerk shall index the affidavit in the name of the mortgagor as grantor.

Any person who causes an affidavit to be recorded in the land records of any city or town in accordance with this section knowing the information and statements therein contained to be false may be fined not more than a dollar amount that is double the face amount of the mortgage falsely discharged and shall make restitution to the affected mortgagee to the extent such mortgagee suffers direct financial loss due to said mortgage being falsely discharged.

The provisions of this section shall not be applicable to mortgages securing lines of credit nor to any mortgage held by a financial institution incorporated under the laws of the state of Rhode Island or to any mortgage held by any financial institution organized under federal laws and maintaining a principal place of business within the state of Rhode Island or to any mortgage held by the Rhode Island Housing and Mortgage Finance Corporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 131, § 1.